Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-705
Who may organize.

Any twenty or more natural persons, residents of the territory to be served by the corporation, of the age of twenty-one years or more, residents of this state, may act as incorporators of a corporation to be organized under sections 70-701 to 70-738 by executing articles of incorporation as provided in said sections.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 5, p. 205;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-805;

R.S.1943, § 70-705.